Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201412-512.02
Perpetual care
trust fund; proceeds; investment.

The cemetery
association shall place at least one
hundred dollars for each cemetery lot sold into the perpetual
care trust fund. Such funds shall be paid by the
cemetery association to the trustees of the perpetual care trust fund, who
shall invest the funds under the same conditions and restrictions as trust
funds are invested under section 30-3201.
If any lots are sold
on contract, thirty percent of all payments received on the contract shall
be paid to the trustee or trustees of the perpetual care trust fund until
the entire payments required by this section are made.

Laws 1953, c. 20, § 2, p. 89;

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 1, p. 91;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 6.